Washington statutes.
RCW 43.133.020

Definitions.

(1) For purposes of this chapter, "special purpose district" means any unit of local government other than a city, town, county, or school district.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, "board" means a board, commission, council, committee or task force.

[ 1987 c 342 s 2.]